Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4514
Rules and regulations for loss-ratio standards.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing loss-ratio standards for long-term care insurance policies if a specific reference to long-term care insurance policies is contained in such rules or regulations.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 14.